Utah statutes.
10-2-107.   Modified request for feasibility study -- Supplemental
feasibility study.
(1) (a) (i) The sponsors of a request may modify the request to alter the
boundaries of the proposed city and then refile the request, as modified, with
the county clerk if:
(A)  the results of the feasibility study do not meet the requirements of
Subsection 10-2-109(3); or
(B) (I)  the request meets the conditions of Subsection 10-2-103(4)(b);
(II)  the annexation petition that proposed the annexation of an area that is
part of the area proposed for incorporation has been denied; and
(III)  an incorporation petition based on the request has not been filed.
(ii) (A)  A modified request under Subsection (1)(a)(i)(A) may not be filed
more than 90 days after the feasibility consultant's submission of the results
of the study.
(B)  A modified request under Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B) may not be filed more
than 18 months after the filing of the original request under Section
10-2-103.
(b) (i) Subject to Subsection (1)(b)(ii), each modified request under
Subsection (1)(a) shall comply with the requirements of Subsections
10-2-103(2), (3), (4), and (5).
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b)(i), a signature on a request filed
under Section 10-2-103 may be used toward fulfilling the signature requirement
of Subsection 10-2-103(2)(a) for the request as modified under Subsection
(1)(a), unless the modified request proposes the incorporation of an area that
is more than 20% greater or smaller than the area described by the original
request in terms of:
(A)  private land area; or
(B)  value of private real property.
(2)  Within 20 days after the county clerk's receipt of the modified request,
the county clerk shall follow the same procedure for the modified request as
provided under Subsection 10-2-105(1) for an original request.
(3)  The timely filing of a modified request under Subsection (1) gives the
modified request the same processing priority under Subsection 10-2-105(2) as
the original request.
(4)  Within ten days after the county legislative body's receipt of a
certified modified request under Subsection (1)(a)(i)(A) or a certified
modified request under Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B) that was filed after the
completion of a feasibility study on the original request, the county
legislative body shall commission the feasibility consultant who conducted the
feasibility study to supplement the feasibility study to take into account the
information in the modified request that was not included in the original
request.
(5)  The county legislative body shall require the feasibility consultant to
complete the supplemental feasibility study and to submit written results of
the supplemental study to the county legislative body and to the contact
sponsor no later than 30 days after the feasibility consultant is commissioned
to conduct the supplemental feasibility study.
(6) (a)  Subject to Subsection (6)(b), if the results of the supplemental
feasibility study do not meet the requirements of Subsection 10-2-109(3):
(i)  the sponsors may file a further modified request as provided in
Subsection (1); and
(ii)  Subsections (2), (4), and (5) apply to a further modified request under
Subsection (6)(a)(i).
(b)  A further modified request under Subsection (6)(a) shall, for purposes of
its processing priority, be considered as an original request for a
feasibility study under Section 10-2-103.
